en: Plant-based margarines, Vegetable margarines, Vegan margarines
da: Plantebaserede margariner, Veganske margariner
es: Margarinas vegetales, Margarinas de origen vegetal
fr: Margarine végétale
nb: Plantebaserte margariner, Veganske margariner
nn: Plantebaserte margarinar, Veganske margarinar
sv: Växtbaserade margariner, Veganska margariner

en: Unsalted margarines
de: Ungesalzene Margarinen
es: Margarinas sin sal
fr: Margarines sans sel
hr: Neslani margarini
it: Margarina senza sale
ja: 食塩不使用マーガリン
lt: Margarinai be druskos
nl: Ongezouten margarine
pl: Margaryny niesolone

en: Salted margarines
de: Gesalzene Margarinen
es: Margarinas con sal
fr: Margarines salées
hr: Slani margarini
ja: 有塩マーガリン
lt: Margarinai su druska
nl: Gezouten margarine
pl: Margaryny solone

en: Margarines high in omega 3
bg: Маргарини с високо съдържание на омега 3
de: Margarinen mit hohem Omega-3-Gehalt
es: Margarinas ricas en omega 3
fr: Margarines riche en oméga 3
hr: Margarini s visokim udjelom omega 3
it: Margarine ricche di omega 3
ja: オメガ3脂肪酸が豊富なマーガリン
lt: Margainės su dideliu omega 3 kiekiu
nl: Margarines met veel omega 3
pt: Margarinas ricas em ômega 3

en: Light margarines
de: Halbfettmargarinen
es: Margarinas ligeras, Margarinas light
fi: kevytmargariinit
fr: Margarines allégées
hr: Svijetli margarini
it: Margarina light, Margarina leggera
nl: Light margarines
pl: Margaryny light

en: Light unsalted margarines, Light unsalted spreadable vegetable fat, Unsalted spreadfat
fr: Matière grasse végétale douce à teneur réduite en matière grasse, margarines douces à teneur réduite en matière grasse

en: 60% unsalted vegetable fat with sunflowerseed, 60% fat unsalted margarine with sunflowerseed
fr: Matière grasse végétale allégée à 60% doux au tournesol, margarine allégée à 60% doux au tournesol
zh: 含葵花籽的 60% 无盐植物脂肪

en: 30-40% fat unsalted vegetable fat, 30-40% fat unsalted margarine
fr: Matière grasse végétale légère à 30-40% doux, Margarine légère à 30-40% MG doux
zh: 30-40% 脂肪量 无盐植物脂肪

en: Margarines with plant sterols esters
fr: Margarine aux esters de stérol végétal

en: Canola margarines
fr: Margarines de Canola

en: Clarified margarines
fr: Margarines clarifiées

en: 30-40% fat unsalted vegetable fat with plant sterols esters, 30-40% unsalted margarine with plant sterols esters
fr: Matière grasse végétale légère à 30-40% doux aux esters de stérol végétal, Margarine légère à 30-40% doux aux esters de stérol végétal

en: 30-40% fat unsalted vegetable fat high in omega 3, 30-40% fat unsalted margarine high in omega 3
fr: Matière grasse végétale légère à 30-40% doux riche en oméga 3, Margarine légère à 30-40% MG doux riche en oméga 3

en: 30-40% fat lightly salted vegetable fat, 30-40% fat lightly salted margarine
fr: Matière grasse végétale légère à 30-40% doux demi-sel, Margarines demi-sel doux légères à 30-40% MG

en: 50-63% fat lightly salted vegetable fat, 50-63% fat lightly salted margarine
fr: Matière grasse végétale demi-sel allégée à 50-63% MG, Margarines demi-sel allégées à 50-63% MG

en: 50-63% lightly salted vegetable fat high in omega 3, 50-63% lightly salted margarine high in omega 3
fr: Matière grasse végétale demi-sel riche en oméga 3 allégée à 50-63% MG, Margarine demi-sel riche en oméga 3 allégée à 50-63% MG

en: 30-40% lightly salted vegetable fat with plant sterols esters, 30-40% lightly salted margarine with plant sterols esters
fr: Matière grasse végétale demi-sel légère à 30-40% aux esters de stérol végétal, Margarine demi-sel légère à 30-40% aux esters de stérol végétal

en: 80% salted vegetable fat, 80% fat salted margarine
fr: Matière grasse végétale salée à 80%, Margarine salée à 80% MG
zh: 80% 含盐植物性脂肪

en: 80% unsalted vegetable fat, 80% fat unsalted margarine
fr: Matière grasse végétale à 80% doux, Margarine douce à 80% MG
zh: 80% 无盐植物性脂肪

en: 70% unsalted vegetable fat, 70% fat salted margarine
fr: Matière grasse végétale à 70% doux, Margarine douce à 70% MG
zh: 70% 无盐植物脂肪